Illinois, session 104th, HB3876.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $27,590,000, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education to meet its 8operational expenses for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 92025. 10    Section 10. The following amounts, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, are appropriated to the Illinois State Board 12of Education for Evidence-Based Funding, provided for in 13Section 18-8.15 of the School Code:14Payable from the Education Assistance Fund........566,589,40015Payable from the Common School Fund.............3,213,015,60016Payable from the General Revenue Fund...........4,084,497,60017Payable from the Fund for the Advancement 18 of Education...................................1,115,136,40019  Total                                        $8,979,239,000 20    Section 15. The following amounts, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, which shall be used by the Illinois State   HB3876- 2 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1Board of Education exclusively for the foregoing purposes and 2not, under any circumstances, for personal services 3expenditures or other operational or administrative costs, are 4appropriated to the Illinois State Board of Education for the 5fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025:6From the General Revenue Fund:7  For a grant to Learning Ally for services for8   Blind/Dyslexic Persons.............................846,0009  For Disabled Student Transportation10   Reimbursement..................................467,366,10011  For Disabled Student Tuition, Public and12   Private Tuition, including prior years' costs..202,732,40013  For District Consolidation Costs/14   Supplemental Payments to School Districts..........416,00015  For a grant to Illinois State University for Autism16   Training & Technical Assistance....................100,00017  For the Philip J. Rock Center18   and School.......................................5,000,00019  For Reimbursement for the Free Breakfast/20   Lunch Program....................................9,000,00021  For Tax-Equivalent Grants, Section 18-4.422   of the School Code.................................275,00023  For Transportation-Regular/Vocational24   Common School Transportation25   Reimbursement, Section 29-5 of the School Code...........026  For a grant to Chicago Lighthouse for Visually  HB3876- 3 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1   Impaired/Educational Materials Coordinating Unit,2   Section 14-11.01 of the School Code..............1,421,1003  For Regular Education Reimbursement4   Per Section 18-3 of the School Code,5   including prior years' costs....................15,668,3006  For Special Education Reimbursement7   Per Section 14-7.03 of the School Code,8   including prior years' costs...................131,812,1009  For all costs associated with Alternative10   Education/Regional Safe Schools.................20,000,00011  For Truants' Alternative and Optional12   Education Program...............................11,500,00013  For a grant to Teach for America for the Teach for14   America Program..................................2,000,00015  For Career and Technical Education...............59,300,00016  For a grant to Illinois State University17   for its National Board Resource Center 18   for National Board Certified Teachers............4,500,00019From the Education Assistance Fund:20  For Transportation-Regular/Vocational Common School21   Transportation Reimbursement,22   Section 29-5 of the School Code................342,000,00023  For Disabled Student Tuition, Public and Private Tuition,24   including prior years' costs.............................025  For Disabled Student Transportation Reimbursement.........026  Total                                        $1,273,937,000   HB3876- 4 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1    Section 20. The amount of $7,850,000, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 3Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for Agriculture 4Education Programs, and not, under any circumstances, for 5personal services expenditures or other operational or 6administrative costs, at the approximate costs below:7  For Agriculture Education Programs................6,395,0008  For Champaign Ford Regional Office9   of Education #9 for Facilitating Collaboration10   for Agricultural Education Local Program support.1,260,00011  For Growing Agriculture Science Teachers,12   at the approximate costs below:13    Southern Illinois University.......................30,00014    University of Illinois.............................30,00015    Illinois State University..........................30,00016    Western Illinois University........................30,000 17    Highland Community College District 519............12,50018    Lake Land Community College District 517...........12,50019    Sauk Valley Community College District 506.........12,50020    Black Hawk Community College District 503..........12,50021    Illinois Central Community College22     District 514......................................12,50023    Joliet Community College District 525..............12,500 24    Section 25. The following amounts, or so much thereof as   HB3876- 5 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1may be necessary, are appropriated to the Illinois State Board 2of Education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025:3From the General Revenue Fund:4  For State and District Technology Support.........2,443,8005  For Advanced Placement Classes......................500,0006  For Principal Recruitment Program.................1,800,0007  For Low-Income Advanced Placement Fee.............2,500,0008  For After School Matters..........................6,000,0009  For After-School Programming.....................25,000,00010  For the Southwest Organizing Project Parent11   Mentoring Program...............................14,000,00012  For all costs associated with the Student Care13   Department.......................................2,000,00014  For all costs associated with the Summer15   Electronic Benefit Transfer program for Children, 16   including administrative costs.....................350,00017  For Grant Accountability and Transparency Act and18   Budgeting for Results Initiatives..................380,00019  Total                                           $54,973,800 20    Section 30. The amount of $748,138,100, or so much thereof 21as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 22Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for Early 23Childhood Education. 24    Section 35. The amount of $850,000, or so much thereof as   HB3876- 6 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 2Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for all costs 3associated with the Community and Residential Services 4Authority. 5    Section 40. The amount of $40,000,000, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for Student 8Assessments, including Bilingual Assessments. 9    Section 45. The amount of $615,100, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for all costs 12associated with Educator Misconduct Hearings and 13Investigations. 14    Section 50. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 16Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for all costs 17authorized by the Educator Licensure Article of the School 18Code, including refunds. 19    Section 55. The amount of $3,000,000, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 21Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for all costs 22associated with Computer Science Equity Program.   HB3876- 7 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1    Section 60. The amount of $3,347,000, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 3Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for deposit into 4The Imagination Library of Illinois Fund for grants associated 5with the Imagination Library of Illinois Grant Program. 6    Section 65. The amount of $45,000,000, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 8Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for grants, 9contracts, and administrative expenses for costs associated 10with Teacher Vacancy Pilot Program. 11    Section 70. The amount of $150,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 13Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for support of 14the P-20 Council. 15    Section 75. The amount of $3,000,000, or so much thereof 16as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 17Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for grants, 18contracts, and administrative expenses associated with 19implementation of the Illinois Comprehensive Literacy Plan and 20a state numeracy plan. 21    Section 80. The amount of $3,500,000, or so much thereof   HB3876- 8 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 2Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for all costs 3associated with the Social-Emotional Learning Hubs and the 4Resilience Education to Advance Community Healing program, 5including continued development and expansion of 6Resilience-Supportive Schools Illinois, at the approximate 7costs below:8  For a grant to the Ann and Robert H. Lurie Children's 9   Hospital of Chicago Center for Childhood Resilience 10   for the Resilience Education to Advance Community 11   Healing program, including continued development12   and expansion of Resilience-Supportive 13   Schools Illinois.................................1,000,00014  For Regional Office of Education #1.................357,14315  For Regional Office of Education #4.................357,14316  For Regional Office of Education #19................357,14317  For Regional Office of Education #21................357,14318  For Regional Office of Education #39................357,14319  For Regional Office of Education #40................357,14320  For City of Chicago School District 299.............357,143 21    Section 85. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 22as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 23Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for a grant to 24Teach Plus Illinois for the Affinity Groups program.   HB3876- 9 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1    Section 90. The amount of $250,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 3Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for a grant to 4Chapin Hall at the University of Chicago to maintain and 5update the Children's Adversity Index pursuant to Section 62-3.196 of the School Code and to provide comprehensive 7technical assistance to ISBE to prepare for required updates. 8ARTICLE 29    Section 5. The amount of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the Teacher Certificate 11Fee Revolving Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education 12for all costs authorized by the Educator Licensure Article of 13the School Code, including refunds. 14    Section 10. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that 15amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State 16Board of Education Special Purpose Trust Fund to the Illinois 17State Board of Education for expenditures by the Board in 18accordance with grants, gifts, royalty payments, or donations 19that the Board has received or may receive from any source, 20public or private, in support of projects that are within the 21lawful powers of the Board, including refunds. 22    Section 15. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that   HB3876- 10 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State 2Board of Education Special Purpose Trust Fund to the Illinois 3State Board of Education for its ordinary and contingent 4expenses. 5    Section 20. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the School District 7Emergency Financial Assistance Fund for use by the Illinois 8State Board of Education as provided in Section 1B-8 of the 9School Code. 10    Section 25. The amount of $2,208,900, or so much thereof 11as may be necessary, is appropriated from the ISBE Teacher 12Certificate Institute Fund to the Illinois State Board of 13Education for costs authorized by the School Code, including 14refunds. 15    Section 30. The amount of $200,000, or so much of that 16amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the 17After-School Rescue Fund to the Illinois State Board of 18Education for its ordinary and contingent expenses. 19    Section 35. The amount of $600,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the School 21Infrastructure Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education 22for its ordinary and contingent expenses.   HB3876- 11 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1    Section 40. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Temporary 3Relocation Expenses Revolving Grant Fund for use by the 4Illinois State Board of Education as provided in Section 52-3.77 of the School Code. 6    Section 45. The amount of $1,050,000, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Board of 8Education Special Purpose Trust Fund to the Illinois State 9Board of Education for all costs associated with its Charter 10School Department, per 105 ILCS 5/27A-7.5. 11    Section 50. The amount of $13,500,000, or so much thereof 12as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Personal 13Property Tax Replacement Fund to the Illinois State Board of 14Education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, for 15Regional Superintendents' and Assistants' Compensation and 16Related Benefits. 17    Section 55. The following amounts, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, are appropriated from the Personal Property 19Tax Replacement Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education 20for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025:21  For Bus Driver Training.............................150,00022  For Regional Superintendents' Services...........18,970,000  HB3876- 12 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1    Total                                         $19,120,000 2    Section 60. The following amounts, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, which shall be used by the Illinois State 4Board of Education exclusively for the foregoing purposes and 5not, under any circumstances, for personal services 6expenditures or other operational or administrative costs, are 7appropriated to the Illinois State Board of Education for the 8fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025:9From the Drivers Education Fund:10  For Driver Education.............................14,000,00011From the Charter Schools Revolving Loan Fund:12  For Charter Schools Loans...........................200,00013From the School Technology Revolving Loan Fund:14  For School Technology Loans, Section 2-3.117a15   of the School Code...............................7,500,00016    Total                                         $21,700,000 17    Section 65. The amount of $1,850,000, or so much thereof 18as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Board of 19Education Special Purpose Trust Fund to the Illinois State 20Board of Education for Grant Accountability and Transparency 21Act and Budgeting for Results Initiatives. 22    Section 70. The amount of $2,500,000, or so much thereof 23as may be necessary, is appropriated from the School STEAM   HB3876- 13 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1Grant Program Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education 2for the School STEAM Grant Program. 3    Section 75. The amount of $3,347,000, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Imagination 5Library of Illinois Fund to the Illinois State Board of 6Education for a grant to the Dolly Parton's Imagination 7Library of Illinois Foundation for all costs associated with 8the Imagination Library of Illinois Grant Program. 9ARTICLE 310    Section 5. The amount of $19,904,700, or so much of that 11amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE 12Federal Department of Agriculture Fund to the Illinois State 13Board of Education for its ordinary and contingent expenses. 14    Section 10. The amount of $2,900,000, or so much of that 15amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE 16Federal Agency Services Fund to the Illinois State Board of 17Education for its ordinary and contingent expenses. 18    Section 15. The amount of $50,869,800, or so much of that 19amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE 20Federal Department of Education Fund to the Illinois State 21Board of Education for its ordinary and contingent expenses.   HB3876- 14 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1    Section 20. The following amounts, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, are appropriated to the Illinois State Board 3of Education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025:4From the SBE Federal Department of Agriculture Fund:5  For Child Nutrition...........................1,250,000,0006From the SBE Federal Department of Education Fund:7  For Title I...................................1,350,000,0008  For Title III....................................56,000,0009  For Title IV....................................300,000,00010  For Title V.......................................3,000,00011  For Title X......................................10,000,00012  For Individuals with Disabilities Education Act,13   Deaf/Blind for a grant to Philip J. Rock Center14   and School for Project Reach.......................800,00015  For Individuals with Disabilities Education Act,16   Improvement Program..............................5,000,00017  For Individuals with Disabilities Education Act,18   Preschool.......................................41,000,00019  For Grants for Vocational20   Education - Basic...............................70,000,00021  For Student Assessments..........................35,000,00022  For Institute of Education Sciences Grant.........3,500,00023  For Mental Health Service Professional24   Demonstration Grant..............................3,600,00025  For School-Based Mental Health Services...........7,500,000  HB3876- 15 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1    Total                                      $3,135,400,000 2    Section 25. The amount of $160,000,000, or so much thereof 3as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE Federal 4Department of Education Fund to the Illinois State Board of 5Education for Title II, at the approximate costs below:6  For Title II....................................157,700,0007  For a grant to or contract with the8   Illinois Principals Association in support of9   the Ed Leaders Network platform..................1,500,00010  For a grant to or contract with the Illinois11   Association of School Administrators for providing12   scholarships, support, and mentoring services to 13   superintendents and aspiring superintendents.......650,00014  For grants or contracts for new principal15   mentoring, at the approximate costs below:16   Illinois Principals Association.....................75,00017   Regional Office of Education #19....................37,50018   Chicago Public Schools, District 299................37,500 19    Section 30. The amount of $980,000,000, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE Federal 21Department of Education Fund to the Illinois State Board of 22Education for Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 23IDEA, at the approximate costs below:24  For Individuals with Disabilities  HB3876- 16 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1   Education Act, IDEA............................974,769,5772  For a grant to Illinois State University3   for the Autism Learning and Supports Project.....1,239,8994  For a grant to the University of Illinois 5   for the Center for Transition....................1,000,0006  For a grant to the Illinois Deaf and Hard of7   Hearing Commission for the Illinois Deaf and8   Hard of Hearing Program.............................80,0009  For a grant to United Cerebral Palsy - Seguin10   for the Assistive Technology Exchange Network......450,00011  For a grant to United Cerebral Palsy -12   Seguin for Assistive Technology Training13   and Technical Assistance...........................300,00014  For a grant to Illinois Assistive Technology15   Program for the Assistive Technology Device and16   Loan Program.....................................1,510,52417  For a grant to Northwest Special Education18   Organization for the Illinois Service19   Resource Center....................................650,000 20    Section 35. The following amounts, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, are appropriated to the Illinois State Board 22of Education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025: 23 From SBE Federal Agency Services Fund:24  For Adolescent Health Programs......................500,00025  For STOP School Violence and Mental Health  HB3876- 17 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1   Programs.........................................1,000,0002  For Preschool Development Grant Birth3   Through Five....................................35,000,0004    Total                                         $36,500,000 5    Section 40. The amount of $6,500,000, or so much of that 6amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE 7Federal Agency Services Fund to the Illinois State Board of 8Education for Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services, at 9the approximate costs below:10  For Substance Abuse and Mental11   Health Services..................................4,736,73312  For Mental health services and supports,13   at the approximate costs below:14    Regional Office of Education 40...................533,00015    Intermediate Service Center #2..................1,200,98916    Illinois Department of Human Services..............29,278 17    Section 45. The amount of $164,860,500, or so much of that 18amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE 19Federal Department of Education Fund to the Illinois State 20Board of Education for grants, contracts, and administrative 21expenses of the Elementary and Secondary School Emergency 22Relief Fund per the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021.  23    Section 50. The amount of $4,417,000, or so much of that   HB3876- 18 -OMB104 00109 VOT 10109 b1amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE 2Federal Department of Education Fund to the Illinois State 3Board of Education for grants, contracts, and administrative 4expenses for Homeless Children and Youth per the American 5Rescue Plan Act of 2021. 6    Section 55. The amount of $20,000,000, or so much of that 7amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE 8Federal Agency Services Fund to the Illinois State Board of 9Education for grants, contracts, and administrative expenses 10of the Clean Heavy-Duty Vehicles grant program. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 122025.